Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2023.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 503 of the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 503. Hearing; Judgment; Writ of Possession; Payment of Rent by Tenant.--* * *(b.1) (1) The justice of the peace shall stay the execution of a writ of possession of the real property, from day to day, in the event of extreme weather conditions affecting the real property, including:(i) a temperature or next-day forecasted temperature of 12345678910111213141516171819 thirty-two degrees Fahrenheit or lower;(ii) a winter storm warning or blizzard warning issued by the National Weather Service;(iii) a hurricane warning or tropical storm warning issued by the National Weather Service; and(iv) an excessive heat warning issued by the National Weather Service.(2) When a stay has been granted under this subsection, the execution of the writ of possession for which the stay has been granted shall be given priority and completed within five days after the extreme weather conditions cease.(3) This subsection shall apply to a tenant enrolled in any of the following programs at the time of the service of the writ of possession:(i) Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program.(ii) Medicaid.(iii) Medicare.(iv) Social Security Disability Insurance.(v) Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants and Children.(vi) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.(vii) Supplemental Security Income.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2023PN2582 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324